Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.220

Preplacement and post-placement reports—When not required.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the reports required by RCW 26.33.190 are not required if the petitioner seeks to adopt the child of the petitioner's spouse. The reports required by RCW 26.33.190 and 26.33.200 are not required if the adoptee is eighteen years of age or older.

[ 1984 c 155 s 22.]